District of Columbia statutes.
29A-903

Repealed

Purposes for incorporation.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 481, ch. 397, § 3
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-903.
1981 Ed., § 29-1103.
1973 Ed., § 29-803.